Idaho, session 2025, H0128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 4, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-419, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
36-419. MUZZLELOADER-ONLY SEASON. The department of fish and game
shall not adopt or enforce any agency rule prohibiting the use of sabots in a
muzzleloader-only season.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.